es: Tipo de acción de la pistola de balines: Acción de cerrojo; Cañón abatible; Completamente automática alimentada por CO2; Semiautomática alimentada por CO2; Acción de palanca; Neumática de bombeo múltiple; Acción de bombeo; Neumática de un solo golpe; Pistón de resorte; Otro
el: Τύπος μηχανισμού όπλου BB: Μηχανισμός κινητού ουραίου; Σπαστής κάννης; Πλήρως αυτόματο με CO2; Ημιαυτόματο με CO2; Μηχανισμός μοχλού; Πνευματικό πολλαπλών αντλήσεων; Επαναληπτικός μηχανισμός (pump action); Πνευματικό μονής άντλησης; Εμβόλου-ελατηρίου; Άλλο
nb: BB-våpenaksjonstype: Boltmekanisme; Knekkpipe; CO2-drevet helautomatisk; CO2-drevet halvautomatisk; Bøylemekanisme; Flerpumpet pneumatisk; Pumpemekanisme; Enkeltpumpet pneumatisk; Fjærstempel; Annet
hu: BB-fegyver akciótípusa: Forgó-tolózáras; Csőtörős; CO2-üzemű teljesen automata; CO2-üzemű félautomata; Alsókulcsos; Többször pumpálható pneumatikus; Előagyszános; Egyszer pumpálható pneumatikus; Rugós dugattyús; Egyéb
cs: Typ závěru vzduchovky: Odsuvný závěr; Zlamovací hlaveň; Plně automatická na CO2; Poloautomatická na CO2; Spodní páka; Vícepumpová pneumatická; Pumpičková; Jednopumpová pneumatická; Pružinový píst; Jiné
ko: BB탄 총 작동 방식: 볼트 액션; 브레이크 배럴; CO2 전동식 풀 오토; CO2 전동식 세미 오토; 레버 액션; 멀티 펌프 공압식; 펌프 액션; 싱글 스트로크 공압식; 스프링 피스톤; 기타
lt-LT: Pneumatinio šautuvo veikimo tipas: Spynos mechanizmas; Nulenkiamas vamzdis; CO2 pilnai automatinis; CO2 pusiau automatinis; Svirtinis mechanizmas; Daugkartinio pumpavimo pneumatinis; Pompinis mechanizmas; Vieno pumpavimo pneumatinis; Spyruoklinis stūmoklis; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta mehanizma zračne puške: Potezni zaklep; Prelomna cev; Popolnoma avtomatska na CO2; Polavtomatska na CO2; Na vzvod; Večkratno pnevmatsko črpanje; Potezna; Enostopenjsko pnevmatsko črpanje; Vzmetni bat; Drugo
pl: Typ mechanizmu wiatrówki BB: Zamek czterotaktowy; Łamana lufa; Zasilana CO2 (w pełni automatyczna); Zasilana CO2 (półautomatyczna); Zamek dźwigniowy; Pneumatyczna (wielokrotnego pompowania) (PCA); Zamek pompowy (pump-action); Pneumatyczna (jednokrotnego pompowania); Sprężynowo-tłokowa; Inne
sk-SK: Typ mechanizmu vzduchovky: Odsuvný záver; Zlamovacia hlaveň; Plne automatická na CO2; Poloautomatická na CO2; Pákový mechanizmus; Pneumatická s viacnásobným pumpovaním; Pumpovací mechanizmus; Pneumatická s jedným stlačením; Pružinový mechanizmus; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de acționare pentru pistolul BB: Cu închizător; Cu țeavă basculantă; Complet automată cu CO2; Semiautomată cu CO2; Cu levier; Pneumatică cu pompări multiple; Cu pompă; Pneumatică cu o singură pompare; Cu piston cu arc; Altele
sv: Typ av BB-pistol: Cylindermekanism; Brytpipa; Kolsyredriven helautomatisk; Kolsyredriven halvautomatisk; Bygelrepeter; Flerpumpspneumatisk; Pumprepeter; Enpumpspneumatisk; Fjäderpistong; Övrigt
nl: BB-gun actietype: Grendelactie; Knikloop; CO2-aangedreven volautomatisch; CO2-aangedreven halfautomatisch; Hefboomactie; Pneumatisch met meervoudige pomp; Pompactie; Pneumatisch met enkele slag; Veerzuiger; Overig
vi: Loại cơ chế hoạt động của súng BB: Khóa nòng trượt; Bẻ nòng; Tự động hoàn toàn (bằng CO2); Bán tự động (bằng CO2); Lên đạn bằng đòn bẩy; Khí nén bơm nhiều lần; Lên đạn bằng bơm tay; Khí nén bơm một lần; Piston lò xo; Khác
zh-CN: BB 枪动作类型: 栓动式; 折管式; CO2 动力全自动; CO2 动力半自动; 杠杆式; 多泵气动式; 泵动式; 单冲程气动式; 弹簧活塞式; 其他
th: ประเภทการทำงานของปืนบีบี: โบลต์แอ็กชัน; หักลำกล้อง; ขับเคลื่อนด้วย CO2 แบบอัตโนมัติเต็มรูปแบบ; ขับเคลื่อนด้วย CO2 แบบกึ่งอัตโนมัติ; คานเหวี่ยง; อัดลมแบบปั๊มหลายครั้ง; ปั๊มแอ็กชัน; อัดลมแบบปั๊มครั้งเดียว; สปริงลูกสูบ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de ação de arma de pressão: Ação de ferrolho; Cano basculante; Totalmente automático a CO2; Semiautomático a CO2; Ação de alavanca; Pneumático multibombagem; Ação de bomba; Pneumático de bombagem simples; Pistão de mola; Outro
fi: Ilmakiväärin lukkotyyppi: Pulttilukko; Taittopiippu; CO2-toiminen täysautomaattinen; CO2-toiminen puoliautomaattinen; Vipulukko; Monipumppuinen pneumaattinen; Pumpputoiminen; Yksipumppuinen pneumaattinen; Jousimäntä; Muu
de: BB-Gun-Funktionstyp: Repetierer; Knicklauf; CO2-betrieben vollautomatisch; CO2-betrieben halbautomatisch; Unterhebelspanner; Mehrfach-Pump-Pneumatik; Vorderschaftrepetierer; Einzelhub-Pneumatik; Federdruck; Sonstige
bg-BG: Тип действие на въздушния пистолет: Болтов механизъм; Чупеща се цев; Напълно автоматичен (с CO2); Полуавтоматичен (с CO2); Лостов механизъм; Многократна пневматична помпа; Помпов механизъм; Еднократна пневматична помпа; Пружинно бутало; Друго
pt-BR: Tipo de ação da arma de pressão: Ação de ferrolho; Quebra de cano; Totalmente automática a CO2; Semiautomática a CO2; Ação por alavanca; Pneumática de múltiplos bombeamentos; Ação por bomba; Pneumática de único bombeamento; Pistão de mola; Outra
da: Type af skydemekanisme i BB-gun: Bolt action; Knækløb; Fuldautomatisk (CO2-drevet); Halvautomatisk (CO2-drevet); Lever action; Pumpe-pneumatisk (flere pump); Pump action; Enkeltslags-pneumatisk; Fjederdrevet; Andet
en: BB gun action type: Bolt action; Break barrel; CO2-powered full-automatic; CO2-powered semi-automatic; Lever action; Multi-pump pneumatic; Pump action; Single-stroke pneumatic; Spring piston; Other
ru: Тип механизма действия пневматического пистолета: Продольно-скользящий затвор; Переломный ствол; Полностью автоматический на CO2; Полуавтоматический на CO2; Рычажного действия; Мультикомпрессионная пневматика; Помпового действия; Однозарядная пневматика; Пружинно-поршневой; Другое
zh-TW: BB 槍動作類型: 栓動式; 折管式; CO2 動力全自動; CO2 動力半自動; 槓桿式; 多次泵浦氣動式; 泵動式; 單次泵浦氣動式; 彈簧活塞式; 其他
hr-HR: Tip mehanizma zračne puške: Zatvarač; Prelamajuća cijev; Potpuno automatski na CO2; Poluautomatski na CO2; Polužni zatvarač; Pneumatski na više pumpanja; Zatvarač na pumpu; Pneumatski na jedno pumpanje; Klip s oprugom; Ostalo
fr: Type de mécanisme du pistolet à billes: À verrou; Canon basculant; Automatique à CO2; Semi-automatique à CO2; À levier; Pneumatique à pompages multiples; À pompe; Pneumatique à un coup; Piston à ressort; Autre
tr: BB silahı kurma mekanizması tipi: Sürgülü; Kırmalı; CO2 tüplü tam otomatik; CO2 tüplü yarı otomatik; Levyeli; Çoklu pompalı pnömatik; Pompalı; Tek stroklu pnömatik; Yaylı piston; Diğer
it: tipo di azione pistola ad aria compressa: A otturatore scorrevole; Canna basculante; Completamente automatica a CO2; Semiautomatica a CO2; A leva; Pneumatica a pompa multipla; A pompa; Pneumatica a colpo singolo; A pistone a molla; Altro
ja: BBガンアクションタイプ: ボルトアクション; ブレイクバレル; CO2 駆動フルオート; CO2 駆動セミオート; レバーアクション; マルチポンプニューマチック; ポンプアクション; シングルストロークニューマチック; スプリングピストン; その他